Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Coker House and Champion Hill Battlefield

§ 39-5-131.
Restoration and operation of Coker House and accompanying land on Champion Hill Battlefield.

The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized to secure, preserve, restore, develop, interpret, operate, and maintain the historic Coker House and accompanying land on the Champion Hill Battlefield as an official state historic site.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 444, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2000.).

§ 39-5-133.
Cooperative agreements authorized.

The Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the National Park Service, state and local government entities, nonprofit organizations, and any other groups, organizations or individuals that may be interested in the preservation and development of the Coker House and accompanying land and the Champion Hill Battlefield.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 444, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2000.).